Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5811
Written communications; delivery.

Any policies, contracts, certificates, booklets, termination notices, or other written communications delivered by the insurer to the third-party administrator for delivery to policyholders, contract holders, certificate holders, or subscribers shall be delivered by the third-party administrator promptly after receipt of instructions from the insurer to deliver them.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 86.